Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-132
George Norris House; Nebraska State Historical Society; powers and duties.

The Nebraska State Historical Society shall be responsible for the administration and continued maintenance of the George Norris House and may accept gifts, grants, and bequests for such purposes.

Laws 1986, LB 563, § 5.